Louisiana, session 2026, HB21.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:1735(A), 1759(D), 1782(1), 1788(A), and 1802(1) are hereby
amended and reenacted and R.S. 11:1732(13)(c) and (14)(a)(xiv) are hereby enacted to read
as follows:
§1732. Definitions
The following words and phrases, as used in this Chapter, unless a different
meaning is plainly required by the context, shall have the following meanings:
* * *
(13)
* * *
(c) Any elected official not subject to the provisions of R.S. 11:164 shall be
presumed to meet the definition of "employee" unless a contrary declaration
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 21 ENROLLED
concerning the member's hours has been confirmed by the governing authority of the
member's participating employer.
(14)(a) "Employer" or "participating employer" shall mean:
* * *
(xiv) An employer pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 11:1751.2.
* * *
§1735. Exemption from execution
A. The following items are hereby exempt from any state or municipal tax
and from levy and sale, garnishment, attachment, or any other process whatsoever
as provided in this Chapter, except as provided in R.S. 11:292: the right of a person
to a pension, an annuity, or a retirement allowance, or to the return of contributions,
the pension, annuity, or retirement allowance itself, any optional benefit or any other
right accrued or accruing to any person, and the moneys in various funds created by
this Chapter. These enumerated items shall be unassignable, except as in this
Chapter specifically otherwise provided. Benefits paid under this Chapter shall be
exempt from state income tax. If the contributions of an employee are paid by a
municipality participating employer in order to secure credit for back service, these
funds may be assigned to the municipality participating employer until such time as
the employee has repaid contributions so paid or the municipality participating
employer has released the contributions so paid by written notice to the board of
trustees of the Municipal Employees' Retirement System.
* * *
§1759. Return of accumulated contributions
* * *
D. However, refunds of accumulated contributions shall not be required to
be made to the member or to his estate until and unless the member has been
terminated from a participating municipality employer for thirty days and until all
contributions for said the member have been submitted by the member's employer.
* * *
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 21 ENROLLED
§1782. Computation of normal retirement allowances; return of accumulated
contributions
The monthly amount of the retirement allowance for any member of Plan A
shall consist of an amount equal to three percent of the member's final compensation
multiplied by his years of creditable service, provided however, that:
(1) Any member who has held an elective office in a municipality which is
a participating employer shall be paid an additional annuity equal to one-half of one
percent for each year of such elective service.
* * *
§1788. Optional membership
A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any
municipality participating employer which has its employees covered under Social
Security and enrolled in Plan B of this system, shall have the option of becoming
members of Plan A. The municipality participating employer shall notify the system
of its intention to be enrolled in Plan A in writing. The municipality participating
employer shall not be entitled to transfer the service and contributions standing to
their credit in Plan B to Plan A. After the effective date of such transfer, both the
employee and employer shall make the current contributions required by each under
Plan A.
* * *
§1802. Computation of normal retirement allowance
The monthly amount of the retirement allowance for any member of Plan B
shall consist of an amount equal to two percent of the member's final compensation
multiplied by his years of creditable service, provided that:
(1) Any member who has held an elective office in a municipality which is
a participating employer shall be paid an additional annuity equal to one-half of one
percent for each year of such elective service; and
* * *
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 21 ENROLLED
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.